Virginia statutes. Title 35.1. Hotels, Restaurants, Summer Camps, and Campgrounds.
Chapter 4. Exemptions.

§ 35.1-25.
Exemptions.

The provisions of this title applicable to restaurants shall not apply to:

Boardinghouses that do not accommodate transients;

Cafeterias operated by industrial plants for employees only;

Churches; fraternal or school organizations; organizations that are exempt from taxation under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; and volunteer fire departments and volunteer emergency medical services agencies that hold occasional dinners, bazaars, and other fund-raisers of one or two days’ duration, at which food (i) prepared in the homes of members; (ii) prepared in the kitchen of the church, school, or organization; or (iii) purchased or donated from a restaurant licensed pursuant to Chapter 3 (§

35.1-18

et seq.) is offered for sale to the public. Restaurants licensed pursuant to Chapter 3 that donate or sell food to the entities identified in this subdivision shall not be required to apply for any additional permits from, or pay any additional permit application fees to, the Department for the proposed occasional dinner, bazaar, or other fundraiser;

Grocery stores, including the delicatessen portion that is a part of a grocery store selling exclusively for off-premises consumption, and places manufacturing or selling packaged or canned goods;

Churches that serve meals consisting of food prepared in the homes of members or in the kitchen of the church or purchased or donated from a restaurant licensed pursuant to Chapter 3 (§

35.1-18

et seq.) for their members or their invited guests;

Convenience stores or gas stations that are subject to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services’ Retail Food Establishment Regulations or any regulations subsequently adopted and that (i) have 15 or fewer seats at which food is served to the public on the premises of the convenience store or gas station and (ii) are not associated with a national or regional restaurant chain. Notwithstanding this exemption, such convenience stores or gas stations shall remain responsible for collecting any applicable local meals tax;

Concession stands at youth athletic activities, if such stands are promoted or sponsored by a youth athletic association or by any charitable nonprofit organization or group thereof that has been recognized as being a part of the recreational program of the political subdivision where the association or organization is located by an ordinance or resolution of such political subdivision; or

Any bed-and-breakfast operation that prepares food for and offers food to guests, regardless of the time the food is prepared and offered, if (i) the premises of the bed-and-breakfast operation is a home that is owner occupied or owner-agent occupied, (ii) the bed-and-breakfast operation prepares food for and offers food to transient guests of the bed and breakfast only, (iii) the number of guests served by the bed-and-breakfast operation does not exceed 18 on any single day, and (iv) guests for whom food is prepared and to whom food is offered are informed in a manner established by the Board in regulations that the food is prepared in a kitchen that is not licensed as a restaurant and is not subject to regulations governing restaurants.

No regulation issued by the Board shall require any restaurant that is operated by (i) a nonprofit civic service organization, (ii) a volunteer fire department, or (iii) a volunteer emergency medical services agency to employ a certified food protection manager.

History.

Code 1950, § 35-38; 1962, c. 629; 1972, c. 493; 1981, c. 468; 1982, c. 51; 1993, c. 201; 2004, c. 227; 2010, cc. 86, 594; 2013, cc. 188, 317, 512; 2015, cc. 502, 503; 2018, c. 450; 2019, c. 275.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1995, c. 639, cl. 1 provides: “§ 2. Exemptions to licensure requirements of restaurants.

“Notwithstanding the provisions of Chapters 3 (§

35.1-18

et seq.) and 4 (§

35.1-25

et seq.) of Title 35.1, the requirements for the licensure of restaurants shall not apply to community centers when holding occasional dinners and bazaars of one or two days’ duration, at which food prepared in the homes of members or in the kitchen of the community center is offered for sale to the public.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 227 added subdivision 6; and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 86 and 594 are identical, and in subdivision 5, inserted “consisting of food prepared in the homes of members or in the kitchen of the church” and substituted “or their invited guests” for “as a regular part of their religious observances.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 188 and 317 are identical, and substituted “that” for “which” in subdivisions 3 through 5; substituted “fund-raisers” for “fund raisers” in subdivision 3; added subdivision 7; and made related changes.

The 2013 amendment by c. 512 rewrote subdivision 3 which read: “Churches, fraternal, school and social organizations, and volunteer fire departments and rescue squads which hold occasional dinners, bazaars, and other fund raisers of one or two days’ duration, at which food prepared in the homes of members or in the kitchen of the church, school or organization is offered for sale to the public”; substituted “that” for “which” in subdivisions 4 and 5; inserted “or purchased or donated from a restaurant licensed pursuant to Chapter 3 (§

35.1-18

et seq.)” in subdivision 5; in subdivision 6, deleted “Rules and Regulations Pertaining to the Sanitary and Operating Procedures in” following “Consumer Services” and substituted “Establishment Regulations” for “Stores.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical, and substituted “volunteer emergency medical services agencies” for “rescue squads” in subdivision 3.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 450 added subdivision 8 and made related changes.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 275 designated the existing provisions as subsection A and added subsection B.

§ 35.1-26.
Cities, counties, and towns may by ordinance exempt certain fairs.

The governing body of any county, city, or town may provide by ordinance that this title shall not apply to:

Food booths at fairs, if such booths are promoted or sponsored by any political subdivision of the Commonwealth or by any charitable nonprofit organization or group thereof.

The ordinance shall provide that the health officer of the county, city, or town in which the fair or activity is held, or a qualified person designated by him, shall exercise such supervision of the sale of food as the ordinance may prescribe.

History.

Code 1950, § 35-38.1; 1964, c. 462; 1981, c. 468; 1983, c. 251; 2011, c. 465; 2013, cc. 188, 317, 512.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 465 added subdivision 3.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 188 and 317 are identical, and deleted former subdivision 2, which read: “Concession stands at youth athletic activities, if such stands are promoted or sponsored by either a youth athletic association or by any charitable nonprofit organization or group thereof which has been recognized as being a part of the recreational program of the political subdivision where the association or organization is located by an ordinance or resolution of such political subdivision”; and redesignated former subdivision 3 as subdivision 2.

The 2013 amendment by c. 512 deleted former subdivision 3, which read: “Organizations that are exempt from taxation under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code that hold occasional fund-raisers for the duration of the event at which food is prepared by such organization and is offered for sale to the public.”